Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3 Operation and Powers
7-82-308. Compensation of commissioners — Delegation of powers — Officers — Records — Qualifications — Meetings.

The members of the board shall serve without compensation for their services, except that by resolution duly adopted by the board of commissioners, each commissioner may receive per diem payments for not more than twelve (12) meetings of the board of commissioners in any calendar year, at rates not greater than three hundred dollars ($300) per meeting. However, in any county with a population of not less than two hundred eighty-seven thousand seven hundred (287,700) nor more than two hundred eighty-seven thousand eight hundred (287,800), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the members of the utility district board of commissioners shall serve without compensation for their services, except that by resolution duly adopted by the board of commissioners, each commissioner may receive per diem payments for not more than twelve (12) meetings of the board of commissioners in any calendar year at rates not greater than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per meeting for each district having more than three thousand (3,000) users and not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per meeting for each district having three thousand (3,000) or fewer users. In addition, group medical insurance coverage and group life insurance coverage as may be provided other employees, or payment of premiums for an equivalent or similar group medical coverage and group life insurance coverage that a commissioner may be participating in on April 18, 1985, or that a commissioner may have been participating in on May 25, 1984, or a group plan entered into subsequent thereto; provided, that such payment of such medical coverage and group life insurance coverage does not exceed the per person cost of the district's group medical insurance coverage and group life insurance coverage for its employees. Commissioners in those districts that are not financially distressed utility districts as defined in § 7-82-401(g) that distribute and sell natural gas are thereby authorized, upon resolution duly adopted by the board of commissioners, to receive not more than five hundred dollars ($500) per diem payments in the manner provided in this part.

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

In any county having a charter form of government, the members of a utility district board of commissioners shall serve without compensation for their services, except that, by resolution duly adopted by the board of commissioners, each commissioner may receive per diem payments for not more than twelve (12) meetings of the board of commissioners in any calendar year, at rates not greater than three hundred fifty dollars ($350) per meeting for each district having more than five thousand (5,000) users, and not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per meeting for each district having five thousand (5,000) or fewer users. In addition, group medical insurance coverage and group life insurance coverage may be provided for commissioners as such coverage is provided for other employees, or premiums for an equivalent or similar group medical coverage and group life insurance may be paid; however, payment of such medical coverage and group life insurance coverage must not exceed the per person cost of the district's group medical insurance coverage and group life insurance coverage for its employees.

In any county having a population of not less than one hundred forty thousand (140,000) nor more than one hundred forty-five thousand (145,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the members of a utility district board of commissioners shall serve without compensation for their services, except that, by resolution duly adopted by the board of commissioners, each commissioner may receive per diem payments for not more than twelve (12) meetings of the board of commissioners in any calendar year, at rates not greater than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per meeting.

In addition, group medical insurance coverage and group life insurance coverage may be provided for commissioners as such coverage is provided for other employees, or premiums for an equivalent or similar group medical coverage and group life insurance may be paid; however, payment of such medical coverage and group life insurance coverage must not exceed the per person cost of the district's group medical insurance coverage and group life insurance coverage for its employees.

Any resolution adopted, pursuant to subdivision (a)(3)(A)(i), on or after July 1, 2001, shall not take effect unless and until it is ratified by a majority of the customers of the utility district as provided in this subdivision (a)(3)(B). Upon adopting any such resolution, the board must promptly schedule a meeting of the district's customers for an election of ratification. Such election of ratification must coincide with the next succeeding meeting at which one (1) or more persons shall be elected or selected to serve on the utility district board of commissioners. At least thirty (30) days prior to the date of such meeting, the board must mail written notice to all customers of the utility district announcing the time, place and purposes of such meeting. If a majority of the customers present and voting at the meeting favor ratification of the resolution, then the resolution shall immediately take effect.

Notwithstanding this section or any other law to the contrary, in any county having a population of not less than seventeen thousand eight hundred (17,800) nor more than seventeen thousand eight hundred seventy-five (17,875), or in any county having a population of not less than twenty thousand six hundred (20,600) nor more than twenty thousand seven hundred (20,700), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the members of a utility district board of commissioners shall serve without compensation for their services, except that, by resolution duly adopted by the board of commissioners, each commissioner may receive per diem payments for not more than twelve (12) meetings of the board of commissioners in any calendar year, at rates not greater than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per meeting.

Notwithstanding this section or any other law to the contrary, the members of the utility district board of commissioners in a census designated place that is the county seat of any county having a population of not less than one hundred fifty-six thousand eight hundred (156,800) nor more than one hundred fifty-six thousand nine hundred (156,900), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall serve without compensation for their services, except that by resolution duly adopted by the board of commissioners, each commissioner may receive per diem payments for not more than twelve (12) meetings of the board of commissioners in any calendar year, at rates not greater than three hundred fifty dollars ($350) per meeting.

The board may delegate to one (1) or more of its members, or to its agents and employees, such powers and duties as it may deem proper, but, at its first meeting and at the first meeting of each calendar year thereafter, it shall elect one (1) of its members to serve as president, and another of its members as secretary of the board of commissioners.

The secretary shall keep a record of all proceedings of the commission, which shall be available for inspection as other public records, and shall be custodian of all official records of the district.

Only persons who reside within the district's boundaries or who are customers of the district shall be eligible for appointment or election to the board. As used in this subsection (d), “customer” means a person who is regularly billed and pays for a utility service rendered by the district.

The board of commissioners of every utility district created pursuant to this chapter shall meet at least once each quarter, the time and place of such meeting to be published in accordance with title 8, chapter 44.

Within one (1) year of initial appointment or election to the board of commissioners of a utility district or prior to or within one (1) year of the reappointment or reelection to the board of commissioners of an incumbent utility district commissioner holding office on June 30, 2010, a utility district commissioner shall attend a minimum of twelve (12) hours of training and continuing education in one (1) or more of the subjects listed in subdivision (f)(6). An incumbent utility district commissioner holding office on June 30, 2010, who has received a minimum of twelve (12) hours of training or more in one (1) or more courses addressing subjects identified in subdivision (f)(6) within the past three (3) years may submit a request to the comptroller to be exempt from the training and continuing education requirements set forth in this subdivision (f)(1).

In each continuing education period after the initial training and continuing education required by subdivision (f)(1), a utility district commissioner shall attend a minimum of twelve (12) hours of training and continuing education in one (1) or more of the subjects listed in subdivision (f)(6). For the purposes of this subdivision (f)(2), a “continuing education period” is a period of three (3) years beginning January 1 after the calendar year in which a utility district commissioner completes the training and continuing education requirements set forth in subdivision (f)(1) and each succeeding three-year period thereafter.

For purposes of subdivisions (f)(1) and (2), a utility district commissioner may request a training and continuing education extension of up to six (6) months from the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee. The request shall only be granted upon a reasonable showing of substantial compliance with subdivisions (f)(1) and (2). If the extension is granted, the utility district commissioner must complete any additional required training hours necessary to achieve full compliance for only the relevant continuing education period within the extension period. The utility district commissioner shall file copies of any extension request letters and corresponding comptroller of the treasury determination letters with the utility management review board. The failure to file this information with the utility management review board shall cause a commissioner to be ineligible to receive any further payment or benefit as provided in subsection (a) until the information is properly filed.

Each utility district commissioner shall certify by January 31 of each year the training and continuing education courses attended during the prior calendar year by filing an annual written statement with the utility district on a form developed by the comptroller. Each annual statement shall identify the date of each course attended, its subject matter, location, sponsor, and the hours attended for each course and shall include a certificate of attendance for each course listed on the annual statement. Each utility district commissioner shall be responsible for obtaining a certificate of attendance certifying that the utility district commissioner attended the course, on a form acceptable to the comptroller. The failure to file the annual statement shall cause a commissioner to be ineligible to receive any further payment or benefit as provided in subsection (a) until the annual written statement is filed. Each utility district shall keep for six (6) years after the calendar year in which each annual statement is filed a copy of the annual statements of attendance filed by members of the board of commissioners of the utility district.

The utility district shall be responsible for paying the training and continuing education course registration and travel expenses for the training and continuing education required by this subsection (f) for the members of the utility district's board of commissioners.

The subjects for the training and continuing education required by subdivisions (f)(1) and (2) shall include, but not be limited to, board governance, financial oversight, policy-making responsibilities and other topics reasonably related to the duties of the members of the board of commissioners of a utility district.

Any association or organization with appropriate knowledge and experience may prepare a training and continuing education curriculum for utility district commissioners covering the subjects set forth in subdivision (f)(6) to be submitted to the comptroller for review and approval prior to use. The comptroller shall file a copy of approved training and continuing education curriculum with the utility management review board. Changes and updates to the curriculum shall be submitted to the comptroller for approval prior to use. Any training and continuing education curriculum approved by the comptroller shall be updated every three (3) years and resubmitted to the comptroller for review and approval.

Nothing in this subsection (f) shall prohibit the utility management review board from requiring training and continuing education in addition to that required under this subsection (f) for utility district commissioners of a utility district which is financially distressed under § 7-82-703.

As used in this subsection (f), “utility district commissioners” include the members of the governing board of any utility district created pursuant to this chapter or any public or private act and the members of the governing board of any water or sewer authority created by any public or private act.

[Deleted by 2020 ch. 627 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2020 ch. 627 amendment.]

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.29; Acts 1963, ch. 193, §§ 1, 2; 1968, ch. 567, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2615; Acts 1981, ch. 145, § 1; 1982, ch. 839, § 1; 1983, ch. 145, § 1; 1983, ch. 146, § 1; 1983, ch. 364, § 1; 1984, ch. 706, § 1; 1984, ch. 796, §§ 2, 4; 1985, ch. 210, § 1; 1987, ch. 422, § 5; 1989, ch. 139, § 3; 1989, ch. 221, § 4; 1989, ch. 268, § 2; 1990, ch. 722, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 307, § 1; 1995, ch. 453, § 1; 1998, ch. 961, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 1; 2001, ch. 83, § 1; 2005, ch. 230, § 1; 2007, ch. 74, § 1; 2009, ch. 398, § 1; 2010, ch. 1146, §§ 9, 10; 2014, ch. 628, § 6; 2017, ch. 118, § 3; 2017, ch. 129, § 9; 2018, ch. 915, § 1; 2020, ch. 590, § 1; 2020, ch. 627, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 398, § 1 provided that: “Notwithstanding subsection (f), thirty (30) days after the adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the commissioners of any water and sewer utility district to which subsection (f) applies, the applicable provisions of subsection (a) shall apply to per diem payments for commissioners of the utility district.

“(2) Upon the adoption of the resolution, subsection (f) shall be repealed.”

On September 8, 2009, the Huntsville Utility District of Scott County, the county to which former subsection (f) applied, voted to adopt the resolution; therefore, subsection (a) applies to that utility district and subsections (f) and (g) are repealed. Former subsections (f) and (g) read: “(f)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), for any water and sewer utility district in any county with a population of not less than eighteen thousand two hundred (18,200) and not more than eighteen thousand five hundred (18,500), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the members of the utility district board of commissioners shall serve without compensation for their services, except that, by resolution duly adopted by the board of commissioners, each commissioner may receive per diem payments for not more than twelve (12) meetings of the board of commissioners in any calendar year at rates not greater than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per meeting.

“(2) Before any per diem payments may be made pursuant to this subsection (f), the customers of the utility district shall approve the action of the board in its resolution in an election. The board shall schedule a meeting of the district’s customers for an election for the approval of the resolution by the customers. At least thirty (30) days prior to such meeting, the board shall mail written notice of such meeting to all customers of the utility district. A majority of customers present and voting at the meeting shall approve the resolution.

“(g)(1) Notwithstanding subsection (f), thirty (30) days after the adoption of a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the commissioners of any water and sewer utility district to which subsection (f) applies, the applicable provisions of subsection (a) shall apply to per diem payments for commissioners of the utility district.

“(2) Upon the adoption of the resolution, subsection (f) shall be repealed.

“(3) If no action is taken prior to December 1, 2009, or if the resolution is not adopted in accordance with this subsection (g) by December 1, 2009, this subsection (g) shall be repealed.

“(4) The presiding officer of the board of commissioners shall notify the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission of the results of the action taken by the board of commissioners.”

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2010, ch. 1146, § 13 provided that notwithstanding §8-48-101, the office of a district commissioner will not be vacated on June 30, 2010 solely because the district commissioner is not a district resident or customer and the district commissioner may continue in office until the expiration of such commissioner's term of office in effect on June 30, 2010.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by ch. 118, in (f), added present (3) and redesignated former (3)-(8) as (4)-(9), and substituted “subdivision (f)(6)” for “subdivision (f)(5)” twice in (f)(1), at the end of the first sentence of (f)(2), and in the first sentence of (f)(7).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 129 deleted former (e)(2) which read :”(2)(A) No provision of this subsection (e) shall apply to any gas utility district for the reasons set out in §7-82-103. “(B) This subsection (e) shall not apply in counties having the following populations, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census: not less than nor more than 13,600 13,610 28,500 28,560 28,690 28,750 48,400 48,500.”

The 2018 amendment added (a)(5).

The 2020 amendment by ch. 590, deleted (a)(2), which read: “In any county with a population of not less than eighty-five thousand eight hundred (85,800) nor more than eighty-six thousand one hundred (86,100), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the members of utility district board of commissioners shall serve without compensation for their services, except that, by resolution duly adopted by the board of commissioners, each commissioner may receive per diem payments for not more than twelve (12) meetings of the board of commissioners in any calendar year, at rates not greater than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per meeting for each district having more than three thousand (3,000) users, and not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per meeting for each district having three thousand (3,000) or fewer users.”

The 2020 amendment by ch. 627, deleted “provided, that the education and training requirements pursuant to subsection (g) and not this subsection (f) shall apply to members of the governing board of a gas utility district” following “private act” at the end of (f)(9); and deleted (g) and (h), which read: “(g) Subsection (f) shall not apply to any member of the governing board of a gas utility district who receives extensive annual training substantially equal to the training required pursuant to subsection (f) offered by an association of gas utility districts or directly through the gas utility district; provided, that the gas utility district submits the training curriculum to the comptroller for review and approval prior to use.” “(h) If a utility district provides both water and gas, then the members of the governing board shall be subject to the education and training requirements of either subsection (f) or (g) based on the predominate customer base of the utility district.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 118, § 6. April 12, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 129, § 15. April 17, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 915, § 2. May 1, 2018.

Acts 2020, ch. 590, § 2. July 1, 2020.

Acts 2020, ch. 627, § 10. March 20, 2020.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. Payments to utility district commissioner in lieu of insurance premium payments, OAG 99-133, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 175 (7/7/99).

Variation in insurance premium amounts for county gas utility commissioners, OAG 04-048, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (3/22/04).

7-82-309. Powers of commissioners — Payment of expenses.

The board of commissioners of any district has the power and authority to:

Exercise by vote, ordinance or resolution all of the general and specific powers of the district;

Make all needful rules, regulations and bylaws for the management and the conduct of the affairs of the district and of the board;

Adopt a seal for the district, prescribe the style of the seal, and alter the seal at pleasure;

Lease, purchase, sell, convey and mortgage the property of the district and to execute all instruments, contracts, mortgages, deeds or bonds on behalf of the district in such manner as the board shall direct;

Inquire into any matter relating to the affairs of the district, compel by subpoena the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers material to any such inquiry, administer oaths to witnesses and examine such witnesses;

Notwithstanding any public or private act to the contrary, in all utility districts in the state, any member of the board of commissioners and any board or committee member elected or appointed by the board of commissioners, and any official or employee of the utility district whose salary is set by charter or general law, may be reimbursed from district funds for the actual expense that such utility district officer may incur as an incident to holding such office;

The utility district board of commissioners shall determine whether or not to pay the expenses incurred by members of the board, and any board or committee member elected or appointed by the president of the board of commissioners, and any official or employee of the utility district whose salary is set by charter or general law; and, if it is determined that the utility district will reimburse expenses, it shall enact a written policy as to how expenses will be reimbursed and determine what expenses are reimbursable;

In such utility district, it is the duty of the board of commissioners to prescribe forms on which expenses shall be reported. The board of commissioners may designate such responsibility to the chief administrative officer of the district. It is the duty of the board of commissioners, or its designee, to examine such expense report to determine if all expenses so listed as reimbursable are legally reimbursable expenditures within the schedule as determined by the utility district board of commissioners, and, if such listed expenses are reimbursable, then forward the expense report to the proper disbursing officer for payment;

To the extent not adequately documented as provided in subdivision (a)(6)(C), expense allowances shall be considered compensation for purposes of any salary limitations as may be provided by statute, charter or private act;

All utility district travel and expense reimbursement policies, and any amendments to the policies, shall be filed with the office of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller of the treasury's designee. Such policies and amendments are not subject to approval of, but shall not be effective until filed with, the office of the comptroller of the treasury;

The Tennessee Association of Utility Districts (TAUD) shall disseminate, and amend from time to time as necessary, a model travel and expense policy to provide guidance for the various utility districts. Such policy, and amendments to the policy, are subject to the approval of the comptroller of the treasury. Any utility district that adopts the policy promulgated by the TAUD is not required to file such policy with the office of the comptroller of the treasury, but shall notify the office in writing of adoption of the model policy;

Appoint and fix the salaries and duties of such officers, experts, agents and employees as it deems necessary, hold office during the pleasure of the board and upon such terms and conditions as the board may require; and

Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its functions.

All powers and authority enumerated in this section must be exercised by the district for the welfare and benefit of the public served by the district.

Acts 1937, ch. 248, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3695.34 (Williams, § 3695.33); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-2616; Acts 1987, ch. 422, § 6; 1989, ch. 139, § 4; 1989, ch. 221, § 5; 1994, ch. 918, § 3; 2017, ch. 129, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote (b) which read: “(b) (1) All powers and authority enumerated in this section shall be exercised by such district for the welfare and benefit of the public served by such district. “(2)(A) This subsection (b) shall not apply to any gas utility district for the reasons set out in §7-82-103. “(B) This subsection (b) shall not apply in counties having the following populations, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census: not less than nor more than 13,600 13,610 28,500 28,560 28,690 28,750 48,400 48,500.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 129, § 15. April 17, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-310. Personnel not to benefit from water service agreements.

All personnel employed by the board of commissioners of any utility district incorporated under this chapter, including, but not limited to, the commissioners themselves, are hereby prohibited from receiving any money or other goods or services of value of any sort as a result of any agreement, contractual or otherwise, for the installation of water service within the bounds of the district; and further, such persons are also prohibited from receiving any moneys or other goods or services of value of any sort as a result of any agreement, contractual or otherwise, for the sale of any materials to be installed within the bounds of the district as water service.

Acts 1980, ch. 840, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. Utility district contract with manager, OAG 94-104, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 105 (9/9/94).

Independent work activities of utility district employees, OAG 95-120, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 140 (12/14/95).

7-82-311. Customer installation of water service.

The recipient of water service to be provided by a utility shall be entitled to procure the material and install the water service for property personally owned by such proposed customer of the utility district; provided, that such material and installation shall fully comply with the standard specifications established for the district in which the service is to be placed. It shall be the sole responsibility of the utility to procure and install the meter for such service.

Acts 1980, ch. 840, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-312. Payment of fees or assessments — Actions — Liens — Notice.

Any utility district, whether created pursuant to general law or uncodified public chapter, may enforce the payment of fees or assessments charged for sewer or wastewater disposal utility services by filing an action in the same manner and with the same penalties and interest attached as provided for the enforcement of unpaid taxes pursuant to title 67, including the sale on execution of such property as provided in title 26, chapter 5, and the redemption provisions of title 66, chapter 8. Such action may be taken only once every calendar year by the utility district for unpaid sewer or wastewater utility fees or assessments. The utility district shall be required to give notice to the property owner, if different from the utility user, not less than ninety (90) days prior to the filing of any action that would include levying on the real property. Such notice shall be mailed to the last known address of the property owner as contained on the tax records of the county where the property is located and shall include the amount of the unpaid fee or assessment for sewer or wastewater disposal utility services, together with penalties and interest. The notice shall also contain a statement to the effect that, unless the payments are brought up to date, a lien shall attach to the property and an action shall be filed pursuant to title 67.

The utility district shall bear the reasonable costs incurred by a property owner in defending such an action due to an error in the records or fees of the utility district for the provision of such sewer or wastewater disposal utility services.

For purposes of this section, “utility district” includes the Reelfoot Lake utility and planning district created by chapter 222 of the Public Acts of 1983.

Acts 1984, ch. 796, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1983, ch. 222 was not codified in the Tennessee Code.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 7.

7-82-313. Fire protection — Fees for services rendered to nonsubscribers.

A utility district that dispatches fire trucks and offers other such fire protection services may charge for the services rendered to a nonsubscriber when a fire or other dangerous situation is reported by any citizen or emergency communications district. To impose such charges, the utility district's board of commissioners shall establish and publish a schedule of the costs for such services.

This section shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than eighty-five thousand eight hundred (85,800) nor more than eighty-six thousand one hundred (86,100), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1997, ch. 99, §§ 1, 3.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-82-314. Annual report.

Each utility district under the jurisdiction of the utility management review board pursuant to §7-82-701(a) shall submit to the board by the first day of the utility district's fiscal year an annual report on a form approved by the board. If a utility district fails to submit the annual report in accordance with this section, then the utility management review board may order reasonable sanctions against the utility district.

Acts 2020, ch. 572, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 572, § 3. March 19, 2020.